Arkansas, session 2025, SB298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 18-60-510 is repealed.
18-60-510. Setting aside decree.
(a) Any person may appear within three (3) years and set aside the
decree if he or she shall offer to file a meritorious defense.
(b) Every person laboring under the disability of infancy or
individuals with mental illness or intellectual disabilities, and those
claiming under them, may set aside the decree at any time within three (3)
years after the removal of their disability.






*ZRC063*
02/25/2025 9:55:12 AM ZRC063